Arkansas, session 2025, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 95, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 12 — Interstate Medical Licensure Compact

17-95-1201. Text of compact.
The Interstate Medical Licensure Compact is enacted into law and
entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the
form substantially as follows:
INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE
In order to strengthen access to health care, and in recognition of the
advances in the delivery of health care, the member states of the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact have allied in common purpose to develop a
comprehensive process that complements the existing licensing and regulatory
authority of state medical boards, provides a streamlined process that allows
physicians to become licensed in multiple states, thereby enhancing the
portability of a medical license and ensuring the safety of patients. The
*JMB272*
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
Compact creates another pathway for licensure and does not otherwise change a
state’s existing Medical Practice Act. The Compact also adopts the prevailing
standard for licensure and affirms that the practice of medicine occurs where
the patient is located at the time of the physician-patient encounter, and
therefore, requires the physician to be under the jurisdiction of the state
medical board where the patient is located. State medical boards that
participate in the Compact retain the jurisdiction to impose an adverse
action against a license to practice medicine in that state issued to a
physician through the procedures in the Compact.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
In this compact:
(a) “Bylaws” means those bylaws established by the Interstate
Commission pursuant to Section 11.
(b) “Commissioner” means the voting representative appointed by each
member board pursuant to Section 11.
(c) “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an individual is
guilty of a criminal offense through adjudication, or entry of a plea of
guilt or no contest to the charge by the offender. Evidence of an entry of a
conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be considered final for
purposes of disciplinary action by a member board.
(d) “Expedited License” means a full and unrestricted medical license
granted by a member state to an eligible physician through the process set
forth in the Compact.
(e) “Interstate Commission” means the interstate commission created
pursuant to Section 11.
(f) “License” means authorization by a member state for a physician to
engage in the practice of medicine, which would be unlawful without
authorization.
(g) “Medical Practice Act” means laws and regulations governing the
practice of allopathic and osteopathic medicine within a member state.
(h) “Member Board” means a state agency in a member state that acts in
the sovereign interests of the state by protecting the public through
licensure, regulation, and education of physicians as directed by the state
government.
(i) “Member State” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(j) “Practice of Medicine” means that clinical prevention, diagnosis,
or treatment of human disease, injury, or condition requiring a physician to
obtain and maintain a license in compliance with the Medical Practice Act of
a member state.
(k) “Physician” means any person who:
(1) Is a graduate of a medical school accredited by the Liaison
Committee on Medical Education, the Commission on Osteopathic College
Accreditation, or a medical school listed in the International Medical
Education Directory or its equivalent;
(2) Passed each component of the United State Medical Licensing
Examination (USMLE) or the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing
Examination (COMLEX-USA) within three attempts, or any of its predecessor
examinations accepted by a state medical board as an equivalent examination
for licensure purposes;
(3) Successfully completed graduate medical education approved
by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American
Osteopathic Association;
(4) Holds specialty certification or a time-unlimited specialty
certificate recognized by the American Board of Medical Specialties or the
American Osteopathic Association’s Bureau of Osteopathic Specialists;
(5) Possesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in the
practice of medicine issued by a member board;
(6) Has never been convicted, received adjudication, deferred
adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense
by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
(7) Has never held a license authorizing the practice of
medicine subjected to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal,
or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to non-payment of fees
related to a license;
(8) Has never had a controlled substance license or permit
suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration; and
(9) Is not under active investigation by a licensing agency or
law enforcement authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.
(l) “Offense” means a felony, gross misdemeanor, or crime of moral
turpitude.
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(m) “Rule” means a written statement by the Interstate Commission
promulgated pursuant to Section 12 of the Compact that is of general
applicability, implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of
the Compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the
Interstate Commission, and has the force and effect of statutory law in a
member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an
existing rule.
(n) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States.
(o) “State of Principal License” means a member state where a
physician holds a license to practice medicine and which has been designated
as such by the physician for purposes of registration and participation in
the Compact.

SECTION 3. ELIGIBILITY
(a) A physician must meet the eligibility requirements as defined in
Section 2(k) to receive an expedited license under the terms and provisions
of the Compact.
(b) A physician who does not meet the requirements of Section 2(k) may
obtain a license to practice medicine in a member state if the individual
complies with all laws and requirements, other than the Compact, relating to
the issuance of a license to practice medicine in that state.

SECTION 4. DESIGNATION OF STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE
(a) A physician shall designate a member state as the state of
principal license for purposes of registration for expedited licensure
through the Compact if the physician possesses a full and unrestricted
license to practice medicine in that state, and the state is:
(1) The state of principal residence for the physician, or
(2) The state where at least 25% of the practice of medicine
occurs, or
(3) The location of the physician’s employer, or
(4) If no state qualifies under subsection (1), subsection (2),
or subsection (3), the state designated as state of residence for purpose of
federal income tax.
(b) A physician may redesignate a member state as state of principal
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
license at any time, as long as the state meets the requirements of
subsection (a).
(c) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to
facilitate redesignation of another member state as the state of principal
license.

SECTION 5. APPLICATION AND ISSUANCE OF EXPEDITED LICENSURE
(a) A physician seeking licensure through the Compact shall file an
application for an expedited license with the member board of the state
selected by the physician as the state of principal license.
(b) Upon receipt of an application for an expedited license, the
member board within the state selected as the state of principal license
shall evaluate whether the physician is eligible for expedited licensure and
issue a letter of qualification, verifying or denying the physician’s
eligibility, to the Interstate Commission.
(1) Static qualifications, which include verification of medical
education, graduate medical education, results of any medical or licensing
examination, and other qualifications as determined by the Interstate
Commission through rule, shall not be subject to additional primary source
verification where already primary source verified by the state of principal
license.
(2) The member board within the state selected as the state of
principal license shall, in the course of verifying eligibility, perform a
criminal background check of an applicant, including the use of the results
of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with the exception of federal
employees who have suitability determination in accordance with 5 C.F.R. §
731.202.
(3) Appeal on the determination of eligibility shall be made to
the member state where the application was filed and shall be subject to the
law of that state.
(c) Upon verification in subsection (b), physicians eligible for an
expedited license shall complete the registration process established by the
Interstate Commission to receive a license in a member state selected
pursuant to subsection (a), including the payment of any applicable fees.
(d) After receiving verification of eligibility under subsection (b)
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
and any fees under subsection (c), a member board shall issue an expedited
license to the physician. This license shall authorize the physician to
practice medicine in the issuing state consistent with the Medical Practice
Act and all applicable laws and regulations of the issuing member board and
member state.
(e) An expedited license shall be valid for a period consistent with
the licensure period in the member state and in the same manner as required
for other physicians holding a full and unrestricted license within the
member state.
(f) An expedited license obtained through the Compact shall be
terminated if a physician fails to maintain a license in the state of
principal licensure for a non-disciplinary reason, without redesignation of a
new state of principal licensure.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding
the application process, including payment of any applicable fees, and the
issuance of an expedited license.

SECTION 6. FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE
(a) A member state issuing an expedited license authorizing the
practice of medicine in that state may impose a fee for a license issued or
renewed through the Compact.
(b) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding
fees for expedited licenses.

SECTION 7. RENEWAL AND CONTINUED PARTICIPATION
(a) A physician seeking to renew an expedited license granted in a
member state shall complete a renewal process with the Interstate Commission
if the physician:
(1) Maintains a full and unrestricted license in a state of
principal license;
(2) Has not been convicted, received adjudication, deferred
adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense
by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
(3) Has not had a license authorizing the practice of medicine
subject to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, excluding any action related to non-payment of fees related to
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
a license; and
4) Has not had a controlled substance license or permit
suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration.
(b) Physicians shall comply with all continuing professional
development or continuing medical education requirements for renewal of a
license issued by a member state.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall collect any renewal fees charged
for the renewal of a license and distribute the fees to the applicable member
board.
(d) Upon receipt of any renewal fees collected in subsection (c), a
member board shall renew the physician’s license.
(e) Physician information collected by the Interstate Commission
during the renewal process will be distributed to all member boards.
(f) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to
address renewal of licenses obtained through the Compact.

SECTION 8. COORDINATED INFORMATION SYSTEM
(a) The Interstate Commission shall establish a database of all
physicians licensed, or who have applied for licensure, under Section 5.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, member boards shall
report to the Interstate Commission any public action or complaints against a
licensed physician who has applied or received an expedited license through
the Compact.
(c) Member boards shall report disciplinary or investigatory
information determined as necessary and proper by rule of the Interstate
Commission.
(d) Member boards may report any non-public complaint, disciplinary,
or investigatory information not required by subsection (c) to the Interstate
Commission.
(e) Member boards shall share complaint or disciplinary information
about a physician upon request of another member board.
(f) All information provided to the Interstate Commission or
distributed by member boards shall be confidential, filed under seal, and
used only for investigatory or disciplinary matters.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules for
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
mandated or discretionary sharing of information by member boards.

SECTION 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS
(a) Licensure and disciplinary records of physicians are deemed
investigative.
(b) In addition to the authority granted to a member board by its
respective Medical Practice Act or other applicable state law, a member board
may participate with other member boards in joint investigations of
physicians licensed by the member boards.
(c) A subpoena issued by a member state shall be enforceable in other
member states.
(d) Member boards may share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation
initiate under the Compact.
(e) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of
the statutes authorizing the practice of medicine in any other member state
in which a physician holds a license to practice medicine.

SECTION 10. DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS
(a) Any disciplinary action taken by any member board against a
physician licensed through the Compact shall be deemed unprofessional conduct
which may be subject to discipline by other member boards, in addition to any
violation of the Medical Practice Act or regulations in that state.
(b) If a license granted to a physician by the member board in the
state of principal license is revoked, surrendered or relinquished in lieu of
discipline, or suspended, then all licenses issued to the physician by member
boards shall automatically be placed, without further action necessary by any
member board, on the same status. If the member board in the state of
principal license subsequently reinstates the physician’s license, a license
issued to the physician by any other member board shall remain encumbered
until that respective member board takes action to reinstate the license in a
manner consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state.
(c) If disciplinary action is taken against a physician by a member
board not in the state of principal license, any other member board may deem
the action conclusive as to matter of law and fact decided, and:
(1) Impose the same or lesser sanction(s) against the physician
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
so long as such sanctions are consistent with the Medical Practice Act of
that state; or
(2) Pursue separate disciplinary action against the physician
under its respective Medical Practice Act, regardless of the action taken in
other member states.
(d) If a license granted to a physician by a member board is revoked,
surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or suspended, then any
license(s) issued to the physician by any other member board(s) shall be
suspended, automatically and immediately without further action necessary by
the other member board(s), for ninety (90) days upon entry of the order by
the disciplining board, to permit the member board(s) to investigate the
basis for the action under the Medical Practice Act of that state. A member
board may terminate the automatic suspension of the license it issued prior
to the completion of the ninety (90) day suspension period in a manner
consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state.

SECTION 11. INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) The member states hereby create the “Interstate Medical Licensure
Compact Commission”.
(b) The purpose of the Interstate Commission is the administration of
the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact, which is a discretionary state
function.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be a body corporate and joint
agency of the member states and shall have all the responsibilities, powers,
and duties set forth in the Compact, and such additional powers as may be
conferred upon it by a subsequent concurrent action of the respective
legislatures of the member states in accordance with the terms of the
Compact.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall consist of two voting
representatives appointed by each member state who shall serve as
Commissioners. In states where allopathic and osteopathic physicians are
regulated by separate member boards, or if the licensing and disciplinary
authority is split between separate member boards, or if the licensing and
disciplinary authority is split between multiple member boards within a
member state, the member state shall appoint one representative from each
member board. A Commissioner shall be a(n):
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(1) Allopathic or osteopathic physician appointed to a member
board;
(2) Executive director, executive secretary, or similar
executive of a member board; or
(3) Member of the public appointed to a member board.
(e) The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once each calendar
year. A portion of this meeting shall be a business meeting to address such
matters as may properly come before the Commission, including the election of
officers. The chairperson may call additional meetings and shall call for a
meeting upon the request of a majority of the member states.
(f) The bylaws may provide for meetings of the Interstate Commission
to be conducted by telecommunication or electronic communication.
(g) Each Commissioner participating at a meeting of the Interstate
Commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of Commissioners shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum
is required by the bylaws of the Interstate Commission. A Commissioner shall
not delegate a vote to another Commissioner. In the absence of its
Commissioner, a member state may delegate voting authority for a specified
meeting to another person from that state who shall meet the requirements of
subsection (d).
(h) The Interstate Commission shall provide public notice of all
meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public. The Interstate
Commission may close a meeting, in full or in portion, where it determines by
a two-thirds vote of the Commissioners present that an open meeting would be
likely to:
(1) Relate solely to the internal personnel practice and
procedures of the Interstate Commission;
(2) Discuss matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal statute;
(3) Discuss trade secrets, commercial, or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
(4) Involve accusing a person of a crime, or formally censuring
a person;
(5) Discuss information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(6) Discuss investigative records compiled for law enforcement
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
purposes; or
(7) Specifically relate to the participation in a civil action
or other legal proceeding.
(i) The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall fully
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, including record of any roll call votes.
(j) The Interstate Commission shall make its information and official
records, to the extent not otherwise designated in the Compact or by its
rules, available to the public for inspection.
(k) The Interstate Commission shall establish an executive committee,
which shall include officers, members, and others as determined by the
bylaws. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Interstate Commission, with the exception of rulemaking, during periods when
the Interstate Commission is not in session. When acting on behalf of the
Interstate Commission, the executive committee shall oversee the
administration of the Compact including enforcement and compliance with the
provisions of the Compact, its bylaws and rules, and other such duties as
necessary.
(l) The Interstate Commission shall establish other committees for
governance and administration of the Compact.

SECTION 12. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact;
(b) Promulgate rules which shall be binding to the extent and in the
manner provided for in the Compact;
(c) Issue, upon the request of a member state or member board,
advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the Compact,
its bylaws, rules, and actions;
(d) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules promulgated
by the Interstate Commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper
means, including but not limited to the use of judicial process;
(e) Establish and appoint committees including, but not limited to, an
executive committee as required by Section 11, which shall have the power to
act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in carrying out its powers and
duties;
(f) Pay, or provide for the payment of the expenses related to the
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
establishment, organization, and ongoing activities of the Interstate
Commission;
(g) Establish and maintain one or more offices;
(h) Borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel;
(i) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(j) Employ an executive director who shall have such powers to employ,
select or appoint employees, agents, or consultants, and to determine their
qualifications, define their duties, and fix their compensation;
(k) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel;
(l) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,
materials, and services and to receive, utilize, and dispose of it in a
manner consistent with the conflict of interest policies established by the
Interstate Commission;
(m) Lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or
otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal, or
mixed;
(n) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
(o) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(p) Adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of
the Interstate Commission;
(q) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the member
states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the
preceding year. Such reports shall also include reports of financial audits
and any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate
Commission;
(r) Coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the
Compact, its implementation, and its operation;
(s) Maintain records in accordance with the bylaws;
(t) Seek and obtain trademarks, copyrights, and patents; and
(u) Perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purpose of the Compact.

SECTION 13. FINANCE POWERS
(a) The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff. The total assessment
must be sufficient to cover the annual budget approved each year for which
revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
amount shall be allocated upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate
Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall not pledge the credit of any of
the member states, except by, and with the authority of, the member state.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall be subject to a yearly financial
audit conducted by a certified or licensed accountant and the report of the
audit shall be included in the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

SECTION 14. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of Commissioners
present and voting, adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Compact within twelve (12)
months of the first Interstate Commission meeting.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall elect or appoint annually from
among its Commissioners a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a treasurer,
each of whom shall have such authority and duties as may be specified in the
bylaws. The chairperson, or in the chairperson’s absence or disability, the
vice-chairperson, shall preside at all meetings of the Interstate Commission.
(c) Officers selected in subsection (b) shall serve without
remuneration for the Interstate Commission.
(d) The officers and employees of the Interstate Commission shall be
immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official
capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or
other civil liability caused or arising out of, or relating to, an actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that such person had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Interstate
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that such person
shall not be protected from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such
person.
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(e) The liability of the executive director and employees of the
Interstate Commission or representatives of the Interstate Commission, acting
within the scope of such person’s employment or duties for acts, errors, or
omissions occurring within such person’s state, may not exceed the limits of
liability set forth under the constitution and laws of that state for state
officials, employees, and agents. The Interstate Commission is considered to
be an instrumentality of the states for the purpose of any such action.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect such person from
suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
(f) The Interstate Commission shall defend the executive director, its
employees, and subject to the approval of the attorney general or other
appropriate legal counsel of the member state represented by an Interstate
Commission representative, shall defend such Interstate Commission
representative in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Interstate Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the
defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional
or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person.
(g) To the extent not covered by the state involved, member state, or
the Interstate Commission, the representatives or employees of the Interstate
Commission shall be held harmless in the amount of a settlement or judgement,
including attorney’s fees and costs, obtained against such persons arising
out of an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of the Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result
from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person.

SECTION 15. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in
order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purpose of the Compact.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Interstate Commission
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of
the purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an
action by the Interstate Commission shall be invalid and have no force or
effect.
(b) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the Interstate
Commission shall be made pursuant to a rulemaking process that substantially
conforms to the “Model State Administrative Procedure Act” of 2010, and
subsequent amendments thereto.
(c) Not later than thirty (30) days after a rule is promulgated, any
person may file a petition for judicial review of the rule in the United
States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices, provided that the
filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent the rule from
becoming effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has a
substantial likelihood of success. The court shall give deference to the
actions of the Interstate Commission consistent with applicable law and shall
not find the rule to be unlawful if the rule represents a reasonable exercise
of the authority granted to the Interstate Commission.

SECTION 16. OVERSIGHT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
(a) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce the Compact and shall take all
actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the Compact’s purposes and
intent. The provisions of the Compact and the rules promulgated hereunder
shall have standing as statutory law but shall not override existing state
authority to regulate the practice of medicine.
(b) All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules
in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to
the subject matter of the Compact which may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all
services of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to
intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of
process to the Interstate Commission shall render a judgment or order void as
to the Interstate Commission, the Compact, or promulgated rules.

03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
SECTION 17. ENFORCEMENT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
(a) The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the Compact.
(b) The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the
Commissioners, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for
the District of Columbia, or, at the discretion of the Interstate Commission,
in the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal
offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact, and its
promulgated rules and bylaws, against a member state in default. The relief
sought may including both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(c) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission may avail itself of any
other remedies available under state law or regulation of a profession.

SECTION 18. DEFAULT PROCEDURES
(a) The grounds for default include, but are not limited to, failure
of a member state to perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed
upon it by the Compact, or the rules and bylaws of the Interstate Commission
promulgated under the Compact.
(b) If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under the
Compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the Interstate Commission shall:
(1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other
member states, of the nature of the default, the means of curing the default,
and any action taken by the Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission
shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its
default; and
(2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance
regarding the default.
(c) If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting
state shall be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the Commissioners and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred by the Compact shall terminate on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of the default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
intent to terminate shall be given by the Interstate Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s
legislature, and each of the member states.
(e) The Interstate Commission shall establish rules and procedures to
address licenses and physicians that are materially impacted by the
termination of a member state, or the withdrawal of a member state.
(f) The member state which has been terminated is responsible for all
dues, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of
termination including obligations, the performance of which extends beyond
the effective date of termination.
(g) The Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating to any
state that has been found to be in default or which has been terminated from
the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon in writing between the
Interstate Commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Interstate
Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

SECTION 19. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(a) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a
member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the Compact and which
may arise among member states or member boards.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate rules providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution as appropriate.

SECTION 20. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT
(a) Any state is eligible to become a member of the Compact.
(b) The Compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative
enactment of the Compact into law by no less than seven (7) states.
Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a state upon enactment
of the Compact into law by that state.
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(c) The governors of non-member states, or their designees, shall be
invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a
non-voting basis prior to adoption of the Compact by all states.
(d) The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the Compact
for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and
binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until
it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

SECTION 21. WITHDRAWAL
(a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and remain
binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may
withdraw from the Compact by specifically repealing the statute which enacted
the Compact into law.
(b) Withdrawal from the Compact shall be by the enactment of a statute
repealing the same, but shall not take effect until one (1) year after the
effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has
been given by the withdrawing state to the governor of each other member
state.
(c) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of
the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation
repealing the Compact in the withdrawing state.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of
the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its
receipt of notice provided under subsection (c).
(e) The withdrawing state is responsible for all dues, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including
obligations, the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of
withdrawal.
(f) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur
upon the withdrawing date reenacting the Compact or upon such later date as
determined by the Interstate Commission.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to
address the impact of the withdrawal of a member state on licenses granted in
other member states to physicians who designated the withdrawing member state
as the state of principal license.

03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
SECTION 22. DISSOLUTION
(a) The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the
withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership of the
Compact to one (1) member state.
(b) Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact becomes null and
void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs
of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded, and surplus funds shall be
distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

SECTION 23. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION
(a) The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining
provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable.
(b) The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to
effectuate its purposes.
(c) Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to prohibit the
applicability of other interstate compacts to which the member states are
members.

SECTION 24. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
(a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a
member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are
superseded to the extent of the conflict.
(c) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all
rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member
states.
(d) All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
(e) In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such
provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the
constitutional provision in question in that member state.

17-95-1202. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board is the Interstate Medical
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
Licensure Compact administrator for this state.
(b)(1) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this
subchapter.
(2) Rules promulgated by the board under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be consistent with the Interstate Medical Licensure
Compact necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact Commission for those rules to be effective in this
state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-95-107(c)(1), concerning credentialing
information submitted to the Arkansas State Medical Board by board-licensed
physicians, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A)(i) All physicians licensed by the board shall submit such
credentialing information as the board may request so that the board may
verify the information by the primary source verification procedure in order
to make the information available to credentialing organizations.
(ii) If the physician should fail to submit the
information as the board requests within a period of thirty (30) days, the
failure can result in the suspension of the physician's license to practice
medicine in the State of Arkansas after the matter is presented to the full
board for a hearing pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq.
(B) Upon entering the Interstate Medical Licensure
Compact, the board shall verify credentials either through:
(i)(a) The Federal Credentials Verification Service.
(b) As used in subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of
this section, "Federal Credentials Verification Service" means a system that
is used by the Federation of State Medical Boards to streamline licensure
across states; or
(ii) The state credentials verification service that
has been modified to align with the compact.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-95-306, concerning criminal background
checks for a license or renewal of a license issued by the Arkansas State
Medical Board, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 SB119
(d) Upon entering the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact, the board
shall require that every applicant for a compact licensure shall provide
written authorization to the board to allow the Division of Arkansas State
Police to release the results of a state and federal criminal history
background check report to the board as provided in this section.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Initial rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this act.
(b) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the final
rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-
204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The board shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/C. Penzo















03-03-2025 13:52:45 JMB272